Hawaii statutes.
§46-74 [Waiver of exemption from assessment
for improvements.] Notwithstanding sections 67-8 and 46-74.2 or any other
law to the contrary, any society, association, or corporation engaged in
religious, charitable, educational, scientific, literary, or other benevolent
purposes whose land is exempt by law from assessment for improvements, may file
or join others in filing a petition for an improvement district and shall, by
such filing or joining to file, be deemed to have waived exemption from
assessment for improvements and its lands within the improvement district shall
be assessed for improvements without contribution from the county or the State.
[L 1967, c 35, §1; HRS §46-74]

Note

Section 67-8 referred to in text is repealed.

Revision Note

Section "46-74.2" substituted for
"70-111".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next